Utah statutes.
63K-1-201.   Emergency interim successor to office of governor.
(1)  If the governor is unavailable, and if the lieutenant governor, president
of the Senate, and the speaker of the House of Representatives are unavailable
to exercise the powers and duties of the office of governor, the attorney
general, state auditor, or state treasurer shall, in the order named, exercise
the powers and duties of the office of governor until:
(a)  the governor, lieutenant governor, president of the Senate, or speaker of
the House of Representatives becomes available; or
(b)  a new governor is elected and qualified.
(2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (1), no emergency interim
successor to the lieutenant governor, president of the Senate, speaker of the
House of Representatives, attorney general, state auditor, or state treasurer
may serve as governor.
